Utah statutes.
26-1-23.5.   Rules for sale of drugs, cosmetics, and medical devices.

The department shall establish and enforce rules for the sale or distribution of human drugs, cosmetics, and medical devices.  The rules adopted under this section shall be no more stringent than those established by federal law.

